Idaho, session 2026, H0605.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3022W, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3022W. QUALIFIED TIPS AND OVERTIME COMPENSATION. (1) For taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2029, in
computing Idaho taxable income, there shall be subtracted from federal ad-
justed gross income:
(a) The amount of qualified tips, as defined in section 224 of the In-
ternal Revenue Code as added by P.L. 119-21, received by the taxpayer
during the taxable year, subject to the limitations, phase-outs, and
other provisions provided in such section; and
(b) The premium portion of qualified overtime compensation, as defined
in section 225 of the Internal Revenue Code as added by P.L. 119-21, re-
ceived by the taxpayer during the taxable year, subject to the limita-
tions, phase-outs, and other provisions provided in such section.
(2) The state tax commission may prescribe rules, subject to legisla-
tive approval, as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3024A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3024A. FOOD TAX CREDITS AND REFUNDS. (1) Any resident individual
who is required to file and who has filed an Idaho income tax return shall
be allowed a credit against taxes due under the Idaho income tax act for the
taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and each dependent, as defined in section
152 of the Internal Revenue Code, claimed on the taxpayer's Idaho income tax
return and awarded by the court under section 32-706, Idaho Code, if appli-
cable. For tax year 2022, the credit is one hundred dollars ($100). For tax
years 2023 and 2024, the credit is one hundred twenty dollars ($120). For
tax year 2025 and each year thereafter, the credit is one hundred fifty-five
dollars ($155). If taxes due are less than the total credit allowed, the tax-
payer shall be paid a refund equal to the balance of the unused credit.


(2) A resident individual who is not required to file an Idaho income
tax return and for whom no credit or refund is allowed under any other subsec-
tion of this section shall, subject to the limitations of subsections (3),
(4), (5), (6), and (7), and (8) of this section, be entitled to a refund in the
amount provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A resident individual who has reached sixty-five (65) years of age
before the end of the taxable year and who has claimed the credit available
under subsection (1) of this section, in addition to the amount of credit or
refund due under subsection (1) of this section, shall be entitled to fifty
dollars ($50.00), which shall be claimed as a credit against any taxes due
under the Idaho income tax act. If taxes due are less than the total credit
allowed, the individual shall be paid a refund equal to the balance of the
unused credit.
(3) (4) Except as provided in subsection (8) (9) of this section, a
credit or refund under this section is available only if the individual for
whom a personal exemption is claimed is a resident of the state of Idaho.
(4) (5) In no event shall more than one (1) taxpayer be allowed a credit
or refund for the same personal exemption or under more than one (1) subsec-
tion of this section.
(5) (6) In the event that a credit or refund is attributable to any indi-
vidual for whom assistance under the federal food stamp program was received
for any month or part of a month during the taxable year for which the credit
or refund is claimed, the credit or refund allowed under this section shall
be in proportion to the number of months of the year in which no assistance
was received.
(6) (7) In the event that a credit or refund is attributable to any indi-
vidual who has been incarcerated for any month or part of a month during the
taxable year for which the credit or refund is claimed, the credit or refund
allowed under this section shall be in proportion to the number of months of
the year in which the individual was not incarcerated.
(7) (8) No credit or refund shall be paid that is attributable to an in-
dividual residing illegally in the United States.
(8) (9) Any part-year resident entitled to a credit under this section
shall receive a proportionate credit reflecting the part of the year in which
he was domiciled in this state.
(9) (10) In lieu of the flat tax credit amounts provided in subsection
(1) of this section, a resident taxpayer may elect for the taxpayer, the tax-
payer's spouse, and each dependent, as defined in section 152 of the Internal
Revenue Code, claimed on such taxpayer's Idaho income tax return, the actual
amount of sales tax paid by such persons on food purchases that took place
in Idaho during the taxable year, up to a maximum of two hundred fifty dol-
lars ($250) per person. To make this election, the taxpayer shall indicate
this choice on the taxpayer's tax return or application and submit scanned
copies of sales tax receipts of qualifying food purchases along with the tax
return or application. If taxes due are less than the total credit allowed,
the taxpayer shall be paid a refund equal to the balance of the unused credit.
The provisions of section 63-3042A, Idaho Code, shall not apply to the credit
provided in this section. If a taxpayer meets the qualifications under the
provisions of subsection (5) (6) of this section, such taxpayer shall not be
eligible for the credit under this subsection. If a taxpayer misrepresents


the amount of sales tax paid on food purchases on such taxpayer's tax return
or application, the amounts that were improperly claimed shall be subject
to recovery by the state tax commission pursuant to section 63-3045, Idaho
Code, and the taxpayer shall be subject to the penalties provided in sections
63-3046 and 63-3075(b), Idaho Code.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, "food" means the sale of food
sold for human consumption and shall have the same definition as pro-
vided in 7 U.S.C. 2012 as that section existed on January 1, 2025. The
types and kinds of food products on which sales tax qualifies as credit
by this section shall be the same types and kinds of food products that
are eligible for purchase with benefits provided under the federal sup-
plemental nutrition assistance program and shall not include candy,
soda, restaurant sales of food, food sold in a heated state or heated by
a retail seller, two (2) or more food ingredients mixed or combined by a
retail seller for a single sale, or food sold with an eating utensil pro-
vided by the retail seller such as a plate, knife, fork, spoon, glass,
cup, napkin, or straw.
(b) For the purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(i) "Candy" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural
or artificial sweeteners combined with chocolate, fruits, nuts,
or other ingredients or flavorings in the form of confections,
bars, drops, or pieces. "Candy" does not include any item that
contains more than ten percent (10%) flour by weight or requires
refrigeration.
(ii) "Soda" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural
or artificial sweeteners. "Soda" does not include beverages that
contain milk or milk substitutes, greater than fifty percent (50%)
of vegetable or fruit juice by volume, or that require preparation
before consumption, such as powders or concentrates.
(10) (11) Any refund shall be paid to such individual only upon his
making application therefor, at such time and in such manner as may be
prescribed by the state tax commission. The state tax commission shall
prescribe the method by which the refund is to be made to the taxpayer. The
refunds authorized by this section shall be paid from the state refund fund
in the same manner as the refunds authorized by section 63-3067, Idaho Code.
(11) (12) An application for any refund that is due and payable under the
provisions of this section must be filed with the state tax commission within
three (3) years of:
(a) The due date, including extensions, of the return required under
section 63-3030, Idaho Code, if the applicant is required to file a re-
turn; or
(b) The fifteenth day of April of the year following the year to which
the application relates, if the applicant is not required to file a re-
turn.
(12) (13) The state tax commission shall provide income tax payers with
the irrevocable option of donating credited funds accruing pursuant to this
section. Any funds so donated shall be remitted from the refund fund to the
cooperative welfare fund, created pursuant to section 56-401, Idaho Code,
and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing low-income Idahoans
with assistance in paying home energy costs.


SECTION 3. That Section 63-3077G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3077G. AGREEMENT FOR EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION WITH THE IDAHO DE-
PARTMENT OF CORRECTION. The state tax commission and the Idaho department of
correction shall enter into a written agreement for exchange of information
relating to an individual's incarceration status and whether that indi-
vidual has claimed the Idaho food tax credit pursuant to section 63-3024A,
Idaho Code. Such information shall be confidential to the recipient and may
be used by the Idaho department of correction and the state tax commission
only for purposes of determining whether an incarcerated person erroneously
claimed the food tax credit in violation of section 63-3024A(6) 63-3024A(7),
Idaho Code. No such information shall be public unless it is used in the
course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this state. The
information provided by the state tax commission shall be limited to name,
date of birth, social security number, an indication as to whether the food
tax credit was claimed under that person's name or social security number for
a particular taxable year and incarceration status during the year at issue.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-3077H, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3077H. AGREEMENT FOR EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION WITH THE IDAHO DE-
PARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE. The state tax commission and the Idaho
department of health and welfare shall enter into a written agreement for
exchange of information relating to an individual's receipt of federal food
stamp benefits and whether that individual has claimed the Idaho food tax
credit pursuant to section 63-3024A, Idaho Code. Such information shall
be confidential to the recipient and may be used by the Idaho department of
health and welfare and the state tax commission only for purposes of de-
termining whether a person who was receiving federal food stamp benefits
erroneously claimed the food tax credit in violation of section 63-3024A(5)
63-3024A(6), Idaho Code. No such information shall be public unless it is
used in the course of a judicial proceeding arising under the laws of this
state. Any information disclosed by the Idaho department of health and
welfare pursuant to the provisions of this section must be disclosed in
compliance with the privacy act of 1974, 5 U.S.C. 552a, applicable federal
law or regulations regarding public assistance programs and any applicable
state law or regulation.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2026.